Tennessee, session 114, HB0614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3111, is amended by deleting
the last sentence of the section and substituting:
If a pharmacy shares this information with a pharmacy services administrative
organization or similar entity, then that organization or entity:
(1) Shall not disclose the information to a third party; and
(2) Shall comply, within five (5) business days of receipt, with a written
request from the pharmacy that shared the information to destroy the shared
information.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0614
002584
- 1 -